Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 35 Agricultural Marketing

Cross references. —

As to the board of agriculture, see §§

11-2-102

to

11-2-104

.

As to dairy marketing provisions, see §§

11-36-101

to

11-36-110

.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-126

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 138 to 158, 163 to 178.

§ 11-35-101.
Short title; purpose of provisions.

This act may be known and cited as “The Wyoming Agricultural Marketing Act of 1961.”

It is hereby declared to be the purpose of this act to aid agricultural producers in preventing economic waste in the marketing of their agricultural commodities, to develop more efficient and equitable methods of marketing of agricultural commodities and to aid agricultural producers in restoring and maintaining their purchasing power at a more adequate, equitable and reasonable level.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-659; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to meaning of “agricultural commodity,” see §

11-35-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agricultural commodity” means any horticultural, viticultural and vegetable product, bees or honey, poultry or poultry product, sheep or wool product, either in its natural state or as a processed commodity but does not mean livestock or livestock products other than sheep or wool products;

“Board” means the state board of agriculture;

“Director” means the director of the department of agriculture or his duly authorized representative;

“Control committee” means the appointed officers charged with administering a marketing order;

“Handler” means any person engaged in the operation of packing, grading, selling, offering for sale or marketing any marketable agricultural commodity or who as owner, agent or otherwise ships or causes an agricultural commodity to be shipped;

“Marketing order” means an order issued pursuant to this act;

“Processor” means any person engaged in the operation of receiving, grading, packing, canning, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing or changing the form of an agricultural commodity for the purpose of marketing the commodity;

“Producer” means any person engaged in the business of producing or causing to be produced for marketing, any agricultural commodity;

“This act” means W.S.

11-35-101

through

11-35-116

.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-660; Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 221, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-35-103.
Marketing orders; authority to issue.

Subject to the provisions
of this act, the board of agriculture may issue marketing orders within
this state pertaining to the production, processing, distributing,
pricing or handling of agricultural commodities.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-651; Laws 1969, ch. 160, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-104.
Marketing orders; notice and hearing; marketing agreement regulating
preparation of commodities.

Whenever there is reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order will tend to effectuate the purpose of this act with respect to any agricultural commodity and upon application of any producer or handler of such commodity, notice shall be given for a public hearing upon a proposed marketing order.

Due notice of any hearing called shall be given to all persons who may be directly affected by any action pursuant to this act. The hearing shall be open to the public. All testimony shall be received under oath and a complete record of all proceedings at any hearing shall be made and filed by the director at his office.

In order to effectuate the declared purpose of this act, the board may, after due notice and opportunity for hearing, enter into a marketing agreement with processors, distributors and others engaged in the handling of the agricultural commodity, regulating the preparation, sale and handling of the agricultural commodity which is binding upon the signatories exclusively.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-662; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-105.
Marketing orders; when issued; contents; economic factors to be considered.

After notice and hearing, the board shall issue a marketing order if it finds and states in the marketing order that the order will tend to:

Reestablish or maintain prices received by producers for the agricultural commodity at a level which will give to the commodity power, with respect to the articles and services which farmers commonly buy, equivalent to the purchasing power of such commodity, provided that in establishing prices the board shall as nearly as possible apply the methods and procedures presently prescribed by the United States department of agriculture in making similar determinations;

Approach such equality of purchasing power at as rapid a rate as is feasible in view of the demand for the commodity;

Prevent the unreasonable or unnecessary waste of agricultural wealth because of improper preparation of the agricultural commodity for market, lack of uniform grading and inspection, or excessive shipments to markets;

Protect the interest of consumers of the commodity.

In making the findings set forth in this section, the board shall take into consideration all facts available with respect to the following economic factors:

The quantity of the agricultural commodity available for distribution;

The quantity of the agricultural commodity normally required for distribution;

The cost of producing the agricultural commodity as determined by available statistics and surveys;

The purchasing power of consumers;

The level of prices of commodities, services and articles which farmers buy;

The level of prices of other commodities which compete with or are utilized as substitutes for the agricultural commodity.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-663; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-35-106.
Marketing orders; establishment of control committee; composition,
appointment and term; reimbursement for expenses; employees; duties.

Any marketing order pursuant to this act shall provide for the establishment of a control committee not to exceed seven (7) members to administer the order in accordance with its terms. Members of the control committee shall be appointed by the board from nominations submitted by the authorized industry groups and shall hold office until the expiration of term or until the appointment is withdrawn by the board for cause. If the marketing order affects directly only producers of a particular commodity, members of the control committee shall be producers. If the marketing order affects directly only handlers of a particular commodity, members of the control committee shall be handlers. If the marketing order affects directly both producers and handlers of a particular commodity, the control committee shall be composed of both producers and handlers. The number of producers or handlers upon any control committee shall be designated in the marketing order.

No member of any control committee shall receive a salary but each is entitled to his actual expenses incurred while performing his authorized duties.

The board, with the approval of the control committee, shall employ necessary personnel to carry out the duties authorized herein. The duties of the control committee shall be administrative only.

The director shall serve as an ex officio member of any control committee in addition to the seven (7) appointed members.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-664; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-106

; Laws 1977, ch. 62, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-107.
Marketing orders; referendum for approval or amendment.

No marketing order or
amendment directly affecting producers is effective until the board
determines the issuance of the order is approved and favored by at
least two-thirds (2/3) of the producers eligible to participate in a
referendum on the question of its approval, and who during the representative
period, have produced for market the commodities specified in the
order or amendment in commercial quantities within the production
area specified in the marketing order, and who during the respective
period have produced at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the volume
of the commodity produced for sale.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-665; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-35-108.
Marketing orders; hearing to terminate.

If the board finds that
the termination of any marketing order is requested in writing by
more than fifty percent (50%) of the producers engaged within the
designated production area in the production for market of the commodity
specified in the marketing order, and who produce for market more
than fifty percent (50%) of the volume of the commodity produced within
the designated production area, the board may call a hearing to consider
whether or not the order shall be terminated, suspended or amended.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-666; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-35-109.
Marketing orders; notice of issuance or suspension; when effective.

Upon the issuance of
any marketing order or any suspension, amendment or termination thereof,
a copy of the notice shall be published in the official newspaper
of general circulation published in each county of the state. No order
of suspension, amendment or termination is effective until thirty
(30) days after the date of posting and publication. The director
shall mail a copy of the notice to all persons affected by the terms
of the order, suspension, amendment or termination who files in the
office of the director a written request for notice.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 11-667; W.S. 1977, §

11-40-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-35-110.
Marketing orders; geographic limitations; total class to be included.

Marketing orders may
be limited in their application by prescribing the marketing areas
or portions of the state in which a particular order is effective.
No marketing order shall be issued unless it embraces all persons
of a like class in a given area who are engaged in a specific and
distinctive agricultural industry or trade within this state.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 11-668; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-35-111.
Budget to cover costs; approval; part of marketing orders; liability
for assessment.

For the purpose of providing
funds to defray the necessary expenses incurred in the administration
of this act, the board shall prepare a budget covering the costs,
including advertising and sales promotion when they are requested
in any marketing agreement or order. The budget shall be approved
by the control committee. The budget with the collection of necessary
fees, the time and conditions of payment and in no case to exceed
five percent (5%) of the gross dollar volume of sales or dollar volume
of purchase or amounts handled, shall become a part of any marketing
order upon adoption. Every person engaged in the production, processing,
distribution or handling of any marketable agricultural product directly
affected by any marketing order for the commodity shall pay to the
board at the time and in the manner prescribed by the order as assessment
for the budget the percentage of the gross dollar volume of sales
or dollar volume of purchase or amounts handled, or distribution of
any commodity affected by the marketing order, as necessary to defray
the expenses of the enforcement of this act, but in no case to exceed
five percent (5%) of the gross dollar volume.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 11-669; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-112.
Deposit and disbursement of collected monies; biennial audit required.

Any monies collected
by the board pursuant to this act shall be deposited in a bank or
other depository approved by the state treasurer allocated to each
marketing order under which they are collected, and disbursed by the
director only for necessary expenses incurred by the control committee
and the board with respect to each separate marketing order. Funds
collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate
rules and regulations prescribed by the board, and approved by the
control committee. All expenditures by the director shall be audited
at least biennially by the director of the state department of audit
or his designee, concurrently with the audit of the department of
agriculture, and a copy of the audit shall be delivered within thirty
(30) days after completion to the governor, the board and the control
committee.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 11-670; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1995, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-113.
Assessment deemed personal debt; failure to pay.

Any assessment levied
in a specified amount determined by the market order pursuant to W.S.

11-35-111

constitutes a personal debt of the person assessed and
is due and payable when payment is called for. If the person fails
to pay any assessment upon date due, a complaint may be filed against
the person in a court of competent jurisdiction for the collection
thereof, as provided in W.S.

11-35-116

.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 11-671; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-113; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-35-114.
Books and records to be kept; information and inspection authorized;
confidentiality; exceptions.

All processors or handlers subject to any marketing order or agreement issued pursuant to this act shall maintain books and records reflecting their operations under the marketing order, furnish the control committee or its authorized representatives such information as requested relating to operations under the marketing order, and permit inspection by the control committee or its authorized representatives of such portions of the books and records as relate to operations under the marketing order.

Information obtained by any person under this act is confidential and shall not be disclosed by him to any other person except a person with like right to obtain the information, or an attorney employed to give legal advice thereupon, or by court order.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 11-672; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-114; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-115.
Authority to issue order with terms similar to federal order; duplication
of personnel; uniformity in administration.

If the board finds that it tends to effectuate the declared purpose of this act within the standards prescribed in this act, the board may issue a marketing order applicable to the marketing of any agricultural commodity containing like terms, provisions, methods and procedures as any license or order regulating the marketing of such commodity issued by the secretary of agriculture of the United States pursuant to the provisions of any law or laws of the United States. In selecting the members of any control committee or other advisory agency under the marketing order, the board shall utilize, insofar as practicable, the same persons as those serving in a similar capacity under the federal license or order, so as to avoid duplicating or conflicting personnel.

The director may confer with and cooperate with the legally constituted authorities of states and of the United States to obtain uniformity in the administration of federal and state marketing regulations, licenses or orders. The director may conduct joint hearings or issue joint or concurrent marketing orders for the purpose and standards set forth in this act.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 11-673; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-115; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

§ 11-35-116.
Administration and enforcement; penalty for violation; hearing upon
complaint; disposition thereof; subsequent prosecution; injunctions.

The board is responsible for the administration and enforcement of this act.

Every person who violates this act or any provisions of any marketing order or agreement issued by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

Upon the filing of a verified complaint charging violation of any provision of this act or of any marketing order or agreement issued by the board, and prior to the institution of any court proceeding authorized in this section, the director may call a hearing to consider the charges set forth. The director may take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records or documents of any kind.

If the director finds that no violation has occurred, he shall forthwith dismiss the complaint and notify the parties to the complaint.

If the director finds that a violation has occurred, he shall enter his findings and notify the parties to the complaint. Should the respondents thereafter fail, neglect or refuse to desist from the violation within the time specified by the director, the director may file a complaint against the respondent with the district attorney for the county in which the violation occurred, and the district attorney shall prosecute in the name of the state.

Violations of this act or any provisions of any marketing order or agreement duly issued by the board may also be enjoined by proceedings brought by the district attorney for the proper county, or by the attorney general, regardless of whether criminal proceedings have been instituted, if the director has entered a finding pursuant to subsection (e) of this section that a violation of this act or any provision of any marketing order or agreement issued by the board exists.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 86, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 11-674; Laws 1969, ch. 160, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 11-40-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-35-102(a)(ix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of federal district court's enforcement, or injunction against violation, of agriculture order, regulation or agreement under 7 USC § 608a(6), 74 ALR Fed 276.